src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2025 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ############################## !
!This file contains the numerals !
! ############################## !




! Numerals
! ========

! The initial lexica
! ------------------

LEXICON Numeral
            MILLIJOVNE      ; ! a noun of its own
            OVERTÅVSENE     ; ! for generator over 1000
            JUSTTÅVSENE     ; ! going via 1000
            UNDERTÅVSENE    ; ! for generator under 1000
            OLD             ; ! for "thirteen hundred, etc.
            !num-imprecise  ;
            COLLECTIVE      ;
 +Use/Circ: ARABICS         ; ! for the arabic numerals !
 +Use/Circ: ROMAN           ; ! for the roman numerals!
 +Use/Circ: NUM-PREFIXES    ; ! for §34 etc.!
 +Use/Circ: ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.!
            NUMBERLIKE      ; ! a dustbin







! We now run through the alphabetic numerals, ending up with the case
! inflection of the final number.

! Million, a noun of its own
! --------------------------

LEXICON MILLIJOVNE
         millijovne:millijovn   NUMTAGe_NOTakte ;
 millijovnede+A+Ord:millijovned ORDTAGODD-ord   ;
         millijarde:millijard   NUMTAGe_NOTakte ; ! Num or N?
 millijardede+A+Ord:millijarded ORDTAGODD-ord   ;

nulle:null NUMTAGe_NOTakte ;


! OVERTÅVSENE, for the numerals over 1000
! --------------------------------------

LEXICON OVERTÅVSENE
  O-AKTEF       ; ! 1000
  O-2TO9F       ; ! 2000, 3000, ...
  O-JUSTLUHKIEF ; ! 10000
  O-2TO9LUHKIE  ; ! 20000, 30000, ...
  O-TJUETIE     ; ! 100000
  O-2TO9TJUETIE ; ! 200000, 300000, ...

! All the child lexica of OVERTUVSÁN have the prefix O-.
! They are directed via their respective numerals to the lexicon JUSTTÅVSENE.


! Thousands

LEXICON O-AKTEF
 akte:akte# JUSTTOVSENE ;
            JUSTTOVSENE ;

LEXICON O-X1000
 akte:akte# JUSTTÅVSENE ;

LEXICON O-2TO9F
          göökte:göökte#   JUSTTÅVSENE ;
           golme:golme#    JUSTTÅVSENE ;
        njieljie:njieljie# JUSTTÅVSENE ;
 njieljie+Use/NG:njielje#  JUSTTÅVSENE ; !Saemesth amma
 njieljie+Use/NG:nieljie#  JUSTTÅVSENE ;
 njieljie+Use/NG:nielje#   JUSTTÅVSENE ;
          vïjhte:vïjhte#   JUSTTÅVSENE ;
          govhte:govhte#   JUSTTÅVSENE ;
        tjïjhtje:tjïjhtje# JUSTTÅVSENE ;
        gaektsie:gaektsie# JUSTTÅVSENE ;
          uktsie:uktsie#   JUSTTÅVSENE ;

! Tens of thousands

LEXICON O-JUSTLUHKIEF
     luhkie:luhkie#      JUSTTÅVSENE ;
 luhkieakte:luhkie#akte# JUSTTÅVSENE ;
     luhkie:luhkie#      O-2TO9F     ;
! This lexicon is for the number 10000 only. it is separated from the
! rest to avoid forms like *luhkieluhkietåvsene, etc.


LEXICON O-LUHKIEF
 luhkie:luhkie# JUSTTÅVSENE ;
 luhkie:luhkie# O-X1000     ;
 luhkie:luhkie# O-2TO9F     ;
! this lexicon is accessed only via other O-lexica, and not directly
! from OVERTUVSÁN. Thus, *luhkieluhkietåvsene, etc. is avoided.

LEXICON O-LUHKIE123456789
 luhkieakte:luhkie#akte# JUSTTÅVSENE ;
     luhkie:luhkie#      O-2TO9F     ;

LEXICON O-2TO9LUHKIE
          göökte:göökte#   O-LUHKIEF ;
           golme:golme#    O-LUHKIEF ;
        njieljie:njieljie# O-LUHKIEF ;
 njieljie+Use/NG:njielje#  O-LUHKIEF ;
 njieljie+Use/NG:nieljie#  O-LUHKIEF ;
 njieljie+Use/NG:nielje#   O-LUHKIEF ;
          vïjhte:vïjhte#   O-LUHKIEF ;
          govhte:govhte#   O-LUHKIEF ;
        tjïjhtje:tjïjhtje# O-LUHKIEF ;
        gaektsie:gaektsie# O-LUHKIEF ;
          uktsie:uktsie#   O-LUHKIEF ;




! Hundreds of thousands

LEXICON O-TJUETIE
             tjuetie:tjuetie#        JUSTTÅVSENE       ; ! 100000
             tjuetie:tjuetie#        O-X1000           ; ! 101000
             tjuetie:tjuetie#        O-2TO9F           ; ! 102000, 103000, ...
             tjuetie:tjuetie#        O-LUHKIEF         ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
             tjuetie:tjuetie#        O-LUHKIE123456789 ; ! 100011, 100012, ...
             tjuetie:tjuetie#        O-2TO9LUHKIE      ; ! 120000, 123000, ...
               nïmme:nïmme#          JUSTTÅVSENE       ; ! 100000
               nïmme:nïmme#          O-X1000           ; ! 101000
               nïmme:nïmme#          O-2TO9F           ; ! 102000, 103000, ...
               nïmme:nïmme#          O-LUHKIEF         ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
               nïmme:nïmme#          O-LUHKIE123456789 ; ! 100011, 100012, ...
               nïmme:nïmme#          O-2TO9LUHKIE      ; ! 120000, 123000, ...
               nymme:nymme#          JUSTTÅVSENE       ; ! 100000
               nymme:nymme#          O-X1000           ; ! 101000
               nymme:nymme#          O-2TO9F           ; ! 102000, 103000, ...
               nymme:nymme#          O-LUHKIEF         ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
               nymme:nymme#          O-LUHKIE123456789 ; ! 100011, 100012, ...
               nymme:nymme#          O-2TO9LUHKIE      ; ! 120000, 123000, ...
               nomme:nomme#          JUSTTÅVSENE       ; ! 100000
               nomme:nomme#          O-X1000           ; ! 101000
               nomme:nomme#          O-2TO9F           ; ! 102000, 103000, ...
               nomme:nomme#          O-LUHKIEF         ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
               nomme:nomme#          O-LUHKIE123456789 ; ! 100011, 100012, ...
               nomme:nomme#          O-2TO9LUHKIE      ; ! 120000, 123000, ...
        stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie#  JUSTTÅVSENE       ; ! 100000
        stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie#  O-X1000           ; ! 101000
        stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie#  O-2TO9F           ; ! 102000, 103000, ...
        stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie#  O-LUHKIEF         ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
        stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie#  O-LUHKIE123456789 ; ! 100011, 100012, ...
        stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie#  O-2TO9LUHKIE      ; ! 120000, 123000, ...
 stoereluhkie+Use/NG:stoerre#luhkie# JUSTTÅVSENE       ; ! 100000
 stoereluhkie+Use/NG:stoerre#luhkie# O-X1000           ; ! 101000
 stoereluhkie+Use/NG:stoerre#luhkie# O-2TO9F           ; ! 102000, 103000, ...
 stoereluhkie+Use/NG:stoerre#luhkie# O-LUHKIEF         ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
 stoereluhkie+Use/NG:stoerre#luhkie# O-LUHKIE123456789 ; ! 100011, 100012, ...
 stoereluhkie+Use/NG:stoerre#luhkie# O-2TO9LUHKIE      ; ! 120000, 123000, ...


LEXICON O-TJUETIE2
             tjuetie:tjuetie#        JUSTTÅVSENE       ; ! 200000
             tjuetie:tjuetie#        O-X1000           ; ! 201000
             tjuetie:tjuetie#        O-2TO9F           ; ! 202000, 203000, ...
             tjuetie:tjuetie#        O-LUHKIEF         ; ! 210000, 213000, ...
             tjuetie:tjuetie#        O-LUHKIE123456789 ; ! 200011, 200012, ...
             tjuetie:tjuetie#        O-2TO9LUHKIE      ; ! 220000, 223000, ...
               nïmme:nïmme#          JUSTTÅVSENE       ; ! 200000
               nïmme:nïmme#          O-X1000           ; ! 201000
               nïmme:nïmme#          O-2TO9F           ; ! 202000, 203000, ...
               nïmme:nïmme#          O-LUHKIEF         ; ! 210000, 213000, ...
               nïmme:nïmme#          O-LUHKIE123456789 ; ! 200011, 200012, ...
               nïmme:nïmme#          O-2TO9LUHKIE      ; ! 220000, 223000, ...
               nymme:nymme#          JUSTTÅVSENE       ; ! 200000
               nymme:nymme#          O-X1000           ; ! 201000
               nymme:nymme#          O-2TO9F           ; ! 202000, 203000, ...
               nymme:nymme#          O-LUHKIEF         ; ! 210000, 213000, ...
               nymme:nymme#          O-LUHKIE123456789 ; ! 200011, 200012, ...
               nymme:nymme#          O-2TO9LUHKIE      ; ! 220000, 223000, ...
               nomme:nomme#          JUSTTÅVSENE       ; ! 200000
               nomme:nomme#          O-X1000           ; ! 201000
               nomme:nomme#          O-2TO9F           ; ! 202000, 203000, ...
               nomme:nomme#          O-LUHKIEF         ; ! 210000, 213000, ...
               nomme:nomme#          O-LUHKIE123456789 ; ! 200011, 200012, ...
               nomme:nomme#          O-2TO9LUHKIE      ; ! 220000, 223000, ...
        stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie#  JUSTTÅVSENE       ; ! 200000
        stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie#  O-X1000           ; ! 201000
        stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie#  O-2TO9F           ; ! 202000, 203000, ...
        stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie#  O-LUHKIEF         ; ! 210000, 213000, ...
        stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie#  O-LUHKIE123456789 ; ! 200011, 200012, ...
        stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie#  O-2TO9LUHKIE      ; ! 220000, 223000, ...
 stoereluhkie+Use/NG:stoerre#luhkie# JUSTTÅVSENE       ; ! 200000
 stoereluhkie+Use/NG:stoerre#luhkie# O-X1000           ; ! 201000
 stoereluhkie+Use/NG:stoerre#luhkie# O-2TO9F           ; ! 202000, 203000, ...
 stoereluhkie+Use/NG:stoerre#luhkie# O-LUHKIEF         ; ! 210000, 213000, ...
 stoereluhkie+Use/NG:stoerre#luhkie# O-LUHKIE123456789 ; ! 200011, 200012, ...
 stoereluhkie+Use/NG:stoerre#luhkie# O-2TO9LUHKIE      ; ! 220000, 223000, ...


LEXICON O-2TO9TJUETIE
     akte:akte#     O-TJUETIE  ; ! #one# hundred...
   göökte:göökte#   O-TJUETIE2 ;
    golme:golme#    O-TJUETIE2 ;
 njieljie:njieljie# O-TJUETIE2 ;
  njielje:njielje#  O-TJUETIE2 ;
  nieljie:nieljie#  O-TJUETIE2 ;
   nielje:nielje#   O-TJUETIE2 ;
   vïjhte:vïjhte#   O-TJUETIE2 ;
   govhte:govhte#   O-TJUETIE2 ;
 tjïjhtje:tjïjhtje# O-TJUETIE2 ;
 gaektsie:gaektsie# O-TJUETIE2 ;
   uktsie:uktsie#   O-TJUETIE2 ;


LEXICON JUSTTOVSENE
                    tåvsene:tåvsene#         UNDERTÅVSENE    ;
                tåvsene+Num:tåvsan           ORDTAGODD       ; ! Case infl of tåvsene
            tåvsanede+A+Ord:tåvsaned         ORDTAGEVEN-ord  ;
                    tovsene:tovsene#         UNDERTÅVSENE    ;
                tovsene+Num:tovsen           ORDTAGODD       ; ! Case infl of tovsene
            tovsenede+A+Ord:tovsened         ORDTAGEVEN-ord  ;
              stoeretjuetie:stoere#tjuetie#  UNDERTÅVSENE    ;
! stoere#tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoere#tjuetie   FINAL1          ;
              stoeretjuetie:stoere#tjuet     NUMTAGie        ; ! Case infl of tåvsene
             stoerretjuetie:stoerre#tjuetie# UNDERTÅVSENE    ;
! stoerretjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoerre#tjuetie  FINAL1          ;
             stoerretjuetie:stoerre#tjuet    NUMTAGie        ; ! Case infl of tåvsene
               stoerrenïmme:stoerre#nïmme#   UNDERTÅVSENE    ;
               stoerrenïmme:stoerre#nïmm     NUMTAGe_NOTakte ; ! Case infl of tåvsene
               stoerrenymme:stoerre#nymme#   UNDERTÅVSENE    ;
               stoerrenymme:stoerre#nymm     NUMTAGe_NOTakte ; ! Case infl of tåvsene
               stoerrenomme:stoerre#nomme#   UNDERTÅVSENE    ;
               stoerrenomme:stoerre#nomm     NUMTAGe_NOTakte ; ! Case infl of tåvsene
                stoerenïmme:stoere#nïmme#    UNDERTÅVSENE    ;
                stoerenïmme:stoere#nïmm      NUMTAGe_NOTakte ; ! Case infl of tåvsene
                stoerenymme:stoere#nymme#    UNDERTÅVSENE    ;
                stoerenymme:stoere#nymm      NUMTAGe_NOTakte ; ! Case infl of tåvsene
                stoerenomme:stoere#nomme#    UNDERTÅVSENE    ;
                stoerenomme:stoere#nomm      NUMTAGe_NOTakte ; ! Case infl of tåvsene

! Justtåvsene, for numerals going via 1000
! -------------------------------------
